Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.900

Prospective application.

This chapter applies prospectively only and not retroactively. A municipal or county order, ordinance, rule, or regulation that is in effect as of May 1, 1991, is not invalid because of the provisions of this chapter. This chapter does not prohibit municipalities or counties from adopting stricter guidelines that will assure the proper installation of fire sprinkler systems within their jurisdictions.

[ 1990 c 177 s 12.]